Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-813.02
Commercial film and photographic print processor; immune from liability; when.

Any commercial film and photographic print processor who has knowledge of or observes, within the scope of his or her professional capacity or employment, and who participates in an investigation or the making of any report pertaining to any film, photograph, videotape, negative, or slide depicting child sexual abuse material, as defined in section 28-1802, or participates in a judicial proceeding resulting from such participation shall be immune from any liability, civil or criminal, that might otherwise be incurred or imposed, except for maliciously false statements.

Laws 1988, LB 117, § 7;

Laws 2025, LB383, § 12.